Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 2 Fresh-water Fishing

27-4-90.
Commercial fishing license required; effective dates.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in commercial fresh-water fishing in this state without having a valid commercial fishing license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. The license shall be a personal license required of each individual engaging in the activities covered by this Code section and shall be effective from April 1 to March 31 of the following year.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 91; Code 1933, § 45-802, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 420, § 10; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 7; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 27.

27-4-91.
Lawful devices generally.

Except as otherwise provided by law or regulation, it shall be unlawful for any person engaged in commercial fresh-water fishing in this state to use any gear other than trotlines, baskets in accordance with Code Section 27-4-92, turtle traps, or shad nets in accordance with Code Section 27-4-71, to which have been attached a tag bearing the name, address, and commercial fishing license number of the person using any such gear.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this Code section, “trotlines” means one line which has more than 50 hooks in any combination or a combination of lines with more than 50 hooks in use by one person. The lines must be marked with visible buoys and must be attended regularly and removed after the completed fishing trip. The lines must be submerged at least three feet below the surface of the water. It shall be unlawful to keep any game fish, except flathead catfish, channel catfish, American shad, and hickory shad, taken with such lines.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this Code section, turtle traps must be constructed of netting and shaped as hoop nets. The traps must also have one open muzzle or throat at least 32 inches wide with a ring ten inches in diameter made into the rear of the trap to permit fish to escape. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, it shall be unlawful to use such traps in the Chattahoochee River and its impoundments lying between Georgia and Alabama. It shall also be unlawful to retain any game fish taken in such traps in any of the waters of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 169, § 5; Code 1933, § 45-505; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 91; Code 1933, § 45-803, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 2004, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 7; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 12/HB 869.

27-4-92.
Lawful baskets.

Except as otherwise provided by law or regulation, it shall be unlawful to fish with any basket unless such basket is constructed of one-inch mesh wire and is not more than 72 inches in length and 60 inches in circumference. One throat shall be located at the extreme front of the basket, and the second throat shall be located 17 inches behind the first. The second throat shall have a trap door 7 1/2 inches square.

It shall be unlawful to fish with baskets in fresh-water flowing streams. It shall also be unlawful to fish with a basket without notifying the game warden in the area of the time and place such basket is to be used.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess any basket or trap made of metal, wire, wood, fabric, or other material suitable for use or capable of use in taking fish from the waters of this state unless the person has a commercial fishing license and unless an identification tag as required in Code Section 27-4-91 is attached to the basket or trap; provided, however, that the owner of a private pond may possess and use a basket or trap for taking fish therefrom without the necessity of obtaining a commercial fishing license; provided, further, that baskets meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section may be possessed for the purpose of sale and may be sold at a regularly established place for sale without the owner or operator of the place obtaining a commercial fishing license.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, it shall be unlawful to take any game fish, except flathead catfish and channel catfish, with baskets.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, it shall be unlawful for any person to fish with more than five baskets in the waters of Lake Sinclair and Lake Oconee. No person shall fish with the baskets of other persons unless accompanied by such other persons at the time of such fishing.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 302, § 19; Code 1933, § 45-506; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 85, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 87; Ga. L. 1962, p. 477, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 925, § 4; Code 1933, § 45-804, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 253, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 8; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

27-4-93.
Use of commercial fishing gear within one-half mile below lock or dam.

It shall be unlawful to use any commercial fishing gear, as designated in this title, within one-half mile below any lock or dam on any of the fresh waters of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 91; Code 1933, § 45-806, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.